Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.120

Immunization program—Prohibiting child's presence—Notice to parent, guardian, or adult in loco parentis.

It shall be the duty of the chief administrator of every public and private school and day care center to prohibit the further presence at the school or day care center for any and all purposes of each child for whom proof of immunization, certification of exemption, or proof of compliance with an approved schedule of immunization has not been provided in accordance with RCW 28A.210.080 and to continue to prohibit the child's presence until such proof of immunization, certification of exemption, or approved schedule has been provided. The exclusion of a child from a school shall be accomplished in accordance with rules of the office of the superintendent, in consultation with the state board of health. The exclusion of a child from a day care center shall be accomplished in accordance with rules of the department of social and health services. Prior to the exclusion of a child, each school or day care center shall provide written notice to the parent(s) or legal guardian(s) of each child or to the adult(s) in loco parentis to each child, who is not in compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.210.080. The notice shall fully inform such person(s) of the following: (1) The requirements established by and pursuant to RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170; (2) the fact that the child will be prohibited from further attendance at the school unless RCW 28A.210.080 is complied with; (3) such procedural due process rights as are hereafter established pursuant to RCW 28A.210.160 and/or 28A.210.170, as appropriate; and (4) the immunization services that are available from or through the local health department and other public agencies.

[ 2006 c 263 s 909; 1990 c 33 s 196; 1985 c 49 s 3; 1984 c 40 s 8; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.31.114.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.